Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 1. Scope

§ 2630.
Applicability.

Except as otherwise provided, and to the extent that such a construction would be reasonable, the provisions of this title shall apply to this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2631.
Municipal charters.

Unless otherwise provided by law, when the charter of a municipality provides for procedures other than those established by law, the provisions of that charter shall prevail.

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, all provisions of law relating to a municipality shall apply to such a municipality with a charter.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended 2005, No. M-13 (Adj. Sess.), § 21;

2017, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 11, 2018.